services/web/node_modules/@overleaf/dictionaries/dictionaries/eu.dic
ñabar/1002,5,1
ñirñir/1002,5,1
Abendualdi/41,1
Abe./41,1
Abu./41,1
Adab/40,1
Adiotz/43,1
Adioz/44,1
Agirre/42,1
Agoitz/43,1
Agoiz/44,1
Aiantz/43,1
Aianz/44,1
Ainhoa/42,1
Aitorr/45,1
Aitzorrotz/43,1
Aitzorroz/44,1
Aizarotz/43,1
Aizaroz/44,1
Aizpuru/42,1
Al-Hufuf/40,1
Al-Qatif/40,1
Albisturr/45,1
Albret/47,1
Alcibarr/45,1
Aldatz/43,1
Aldaz/44,1
Alkoz/44,1
Allotz/43,1
Alloz/44,1
Almodovarr/45,1
Aloña/42,1
Altzorriz/44,1
Alzheimerr/45,1
Amaiurr/45,1
Amed/40,1
Amnok/47,1
Amorr/45,1
Amunarritz/43,1
Amunarriz/44,1
Anderaz/44,1
Anerr/45,1
Anotz/43,1
Anoz/44,1
Antipaterr/45,1
Antxoriz/44,1
Apgarr/45,1
Aragas/44,1
Aragats/43,1
Araiz/44,1
Aranatz/43,1
Aranaz/44,1
Arana/42,1
Arantzazu/42,1
Arantza/42,1
Araoz/44,1
Aratz/43,1
Aravah/40,1
Arbaiz/44,1
Arbelaitz/43,1
Ardanatz/43,1
Ardanaz/44,1
Argiñaritz/43,1
Argiñariz/44,1
Arkhangelsk/47,1
Arraitz/43,1
Arraiz/44,1
Arrate/42,1
Arrauntz/43,1
Arraunz/44,1
Arriaga/42,1
Arriano/42,1
Arrieta/42,1
Arriola/42,1
Arrizabalaga/42,1
Arronitz/43,1
Arrosa/42,1
Arruiz/44,1
Artaitz/43,1
Artazkoz/44,1
Arteaga/42,1
Arturr/45,1
Arzotz/43,1
Asgabat/47,1
Astiz/44,1
Atetz/43,1
Auch/40,1
Auerr/45,1
Augsburg/40,1
Auriz/44,1
Aurtitz/43,1
Aviv/40,1
Axdod/40,1
Axularr/45,1
Aza./41,1
Azkarate/42,1
Azkue/42,1
Azov/40,1
Azoz/44,1
Azpirotz/43,1
Baalbek/47,1
Babruisk/47,1
Baerr/45,1
Bagdad/40,1
Baltasarr/45,1
Banat/47,1
Bandung/40,1
Bank/47,1
Barens/44,1
Barnard/40,1
Basauntz/43,1
Basongaiz/44,1
Battambang/40,1
Begoña/42,1
Beijing/40,1
Belfast/47,1
Beloki/42,1
Beraitz/43,1
Berezibarr/45,1
Bering/40,1
Beroiz/44,1
Bessemerr/45,1
Bezkitz/43,1
Biarriz/44,1
Bidania-Goiatz/43,1
Bidart/47,1
Bidderr/45,1
Bismarck/47,1
Biurrun-Olkoz/44,1
Bizirik/47,1
Boeing/40,1
Bohrr/45,1
Boulevard/40,1
Brest-Litovsk/47,1
Brezhnev/40,1
Brunnerr/45,1
Brunswick/47,1
Buchnerr/45,1
Bug/40,1
Bujak/47,1
Burlat/47,1
COVID/41,1
Cancerr/45,1
Carolina/42,1
Cassiopeia/42,1
Cesarr/45,1
Cherbourg/40,1
Club/40,1
Coast/47,1
Comediants/43,1
Connacht/47,1
Cortazarr/45,1
Cowperr/45,1
Credit/47,1
Cuvierr/45,1
Damavand/40,1
Daria/42,1
Detroit/47,1
Dezhniov/40,1
Dobrix/44,1
Doggerr/45,1
Donejakue/42,1
Donetsk/47,1
Donets/43,1
Dopplerr/45,1
Drakensberg/40,1
Ecevit/47,1
Ederr/45,1
Edinburgh/40,1
Egia/42,1
Egibarr/45,1
Eguaras/44,1
Einsenmengerr/45,1
Eka./41,1
Eleonorr/45,1
Elizalde/42,1
Elkano/42,1
Elkarr/45,1
Elkoatz/43,1
Elorz/44,1
Enderitz/43,1
Eparoz/44,1
Erekat/47,1
Errotz/43,1
Escobarr/45,1
Esnoz/44,1
Espotz/43,1
Estenoz/44,1
Estherr/45,1
Estibalitz/43,1
Etxalatz/43,1
Etxalaz/44,1
Etzakit/47,1
Eultz/43,1
Eulz/44,1
Eunate/42,1
Eustat/47,1
Explorerr/45,1
Ezkirotz/43,1
Ezkiroz/44,1
Facebook/47,1
Faisalabad/40,1
Ferrerr/45,1
Ferret/47,1
Fisherr/45,1
Fomalhaut/47,1
Forsterr/45,1
Frankfurt/47,1
Friedländerr/45,1
Galartza/42,1
Galderr/45,1
Gandariats/43,1
Garai/42,1
Garate/42,1
Garazi/42,1
Gard/40,1
Gaucherr/45,1
Gazolaz/44,1
Gdansk/47,1
Generalitat/47,1
Geretz/43,1
Gerrikaiz/44,1
Gesalatz/43,1
Gloverr/45,1
Goñi/42,1
Goiaz/44,1
Goldaratz/43,1
Gorno-Altaisk/47,1
Gorostiaga/42,1
Gorraiz/44,1
Gorritz/43,1
Goteborg/40,1
Growerr/45,1
Guangdong/40,1
Gujarat/47,1
Hadramaut/47,1
Halytx/43,1
Halyx/44,1
Hamburg/40,1
Hammamet/47,1
Harrod-Domarr/45,1
Hektorr/45,1
Helena/42,1
Helmand/40,1
Hitlerr/45,1
Hohhot/47,1
Hufuf/40,1
Hérault/47,1
Iciarr/45,1
Iharnotz/43,1
Iharnoz/44,1
Ikerr/45,1
Ilarratz/43,1
Ilarraz/44,1
Ilurdotz/43,1
Ilurdoz/44,1
Imotz/43,1
Imoz/44,1
Irantzu/42,1
Irati/42,1
Iratxe/42,1
Ira./41,1
Irizarr/45,1
Irkutsk/47,1
Irotz/43,1
Iroz/44,1
Irtish/40,1
Iskanderr/45,1
Itsaso/42,1
Iturriotz/43,1
Itziarr/45,1
Izanoz/44,1
Izaro/42,1
Izarraitz/43,1
Iznik/47,1
Jabierr/45,1
Jaiz/44,1
Jakutsk/47,1
Janaritz/43,1
Jauntsaras/44,1
Jauregi/42,1
Javierr/45,1
Jessnerr/45,1
Jiaodong/40,1
Juno/42,1
Kaliningrad/40,1
Kapulet/47,1
Kartagenerr/45,1
Kattegat/47,1
Keplerr/45,1
Kermanxah/40,1
Kertx/43,1
Khabarovsk/47,1
Khanty-Mansisk/47,1
Kiev/40,1
Kintana/42,1
Kirkuk/47,1
Kitlineq/40,1
Kits/44,1
Kong/40,1
Kopet/47,1
Kortazarr/45,1
Krasnoiarsk/47,1
Krementxuk/47,1
Kutch/40,1
Kuwait/47,1
Laboa/42,1
Lafferr/45,1
Lakarra/42,1
Landerr/45,1
Languedoc/40,1
Lantz/43,1
Larmorr/45,1
Larraioz/44,1
Larrangotz/43,1
Larrea/42,1
Lasa/42,1
Legarda/42,1
Leire/42,1
Leizoz/44,1
Lekunberri/42,1
Leningrad/40,1
Leonorr/45,1
Leorlats/43,1
Leoz/44,1
Leranotz/43,1
Lerruz/44,1
Lete/42,1
Lipetsk/47,1
Liq/40,1
Lizaso/42,1
Loiret/47,1
Ludwigsburg/40,1
Luhansk/47,1
Lurr/45,1
Lut/47,1
Luziferr/45,1
MIR/40,1
Madariaga/42,1
Madotz/43,1
Maestrat/47,1
Maikop/40,1
Mai./41,1
Malas/44,1
Mamurr/45,1
Margarita/42,1
Marina/42,1
Mari/42,1
Maud/40,1
Maurizio/42,1
Mayorr/45,1
Mediterraneo/41,1
Melekeok/47,1
Mendibile/42,1
Mendieta/42,1
Mendiorotz/43,1
Mendizorroz/44,1
Meotz/43,1
Mercatorr/45,1
Merkurio/42,1
Mezkiritz/43,1
Mezkiriz/44,1
Minh/40,1
Minsk/47,1
Molina/42,1
Molotov/40,1
Moussierr/45,1
Muez/44,1
Munarritz/43,1
Muntsaraz/44,1
Murillo/42,1
Murmansk/47,1
Murua/42,1
Music/40,1
Muskitz/43,1
Nagore/42,1
Najaf/40,1
Naltxik/47,1
Napierr/45,1
Nasdaq/40,1
Nazaret/47,1
Negev/40,1
Neptuno/42,1
Nestorr/45,1
Nets/43,1
Nora/42,1
Norrland/40,1
Novokuznetsk/47,1
Novosibirsk/47,1
Nunavut/47,1
Ob/40,1
Oderiz/44,1
Oharritz/43,1
Okhotsk/47,1
Olabarrieta/42,1
Olaitz/43,1
Olaiz/44,1
Olano/42,1
Olarra/42,1
Oliva/42,1
Olondritz/43,1
Olondriz/44,1
Omarr/45,1
Omsk/47,1
Ongotz/43,1
Ongoz/44,1
Orderitz/43,1
Orderiz/44,1
Orenburg/40,1
Orient/47,1
Orondritz/43,1
Orondriz/44,1
Oslerr/45,1
Osteritz/43,1
Osteriz/44,1
Ozkaritz/43,1
Ozkariz/44,1
Pagola/42,1
Palmira/42,1
Panj/40,1
Pazifiko/41,1
Pernik/47,1
Peru/42,1
Petra/42,1
Pfeifferr/45,1
Phonak/47,1
Phong/40,1
Plovdiv/40,1
Port/47,1
Precodorr/45,1
Prut/47,1
Punjab/40,1
Quebec/40,1
Qurnat/47,1
Racing/40,1
Red/40,1
Remo/42,1
Rendu-Osler-Weberr/45,1
Reykjavik/47,1
Rico/42,1
Rih/40,1
Rio/42,1
Rostov/40,1
Sabina/42,1
Saeb/40,1
Saigos/44,1
Saigots/43,1
Salazarr/45,1
Salekhard/40,1
Sankt/47,1
Santiago/42,1
Sariqamish/40,1
Satrustegi/42,1
Schüllerr/45,1
Scientist/47,1
Sendzimirr/45,1
Shuruppak/47,1
Siarnaq/40,1
Smolensk/47,1
Soltxaga/42,1
Stalingrad/40,1
Steinerr/45,1
Street/47,1
Sund/40,1
Sverdlovsk/47,1
Taedong/40,1
Taxkent/47,1
Thayerr/45,1
Tipulatz/43,1
Tipulaz/44,1
Titanic/40,1
Twitter/40,1
Txeliabinsk/47,1
UER/40,1
Udalaitz/43,1
Udalaiz/44,1
Ugarit/47,1
Ugarte/42,1
United/40,1
Urdaitz/43,1
Urdaiz/44,1
Urdatx/43,1
Urdax/44,1
Urdotz/43,1
Urdoz/44,1
Uribe/42,1
Urotz/43,1
Uroz/44,1
Urrutia/42,1
Usotz/43,1
Usoz/44,1
Uztarrotz/43,1
Uztarroz/44,1
Vagharxapat/47,1
Valladolid/40,1
Vernerr/45,1
Villarr/45,1
Vladivostok/47,1
Voronezh/40,1
Wechslerr/45,1
Windhoek/47,1
Winnipeg/40,1
Würzburg/40,1
Zab/40,1
Zaldaitz/43,1
Zaldaiz/44,1
Zarimutz/43,1
Zarimuz/44,1
Zelaia/42,1
Zenotz/43,1
Zenoz/44,1
Zesarr/45,1
Zildotz/43,1
Zildoz/44,1
Zimmerwald/40,1
Zürich/40,1
adar/1002,5,1
agor/1002,5,1
ahakar/1002,5,1
aitor/1002,5,1
aker/1002,5,1
alfer/1002,5,1
apar/1002,5,1
arabiar/1002,5,1
arnasbehar/1002,5,1
azar/1002,5,1
azkor/1002,5,1
bakar/1002,5,1
baserritar/1002,5,1
bazter/1002,5,1
behar/1002,5,1
beldur/1002,5,1
berrazter/1002,5,1
betekor/1002,5,1
bidalkar/1002,5,1
bilur/1002,5,1
bizar/1002,5,1
bizkor/1002,5,1
derrigor/1002,5,1
desager/1002,5,1
desezur/1002,5,1
desuger/1002,5,1
egonkor/1002,5,1
eliztar/1002,5,1
eltzar/1002,5,1
endur/1002,5,1
esker/1002,5,1
ezegonkor/1002,5,1
gailur/1002,5,1
gazur/1002,5,1
gizatiar/1002,5,1
gogotxar/1002,5,1
gozar/1002,5,1
har/1002,5,1
hauskor/1002,5,1
hilezkor/1002,5,1
hondar/1002,5,1
iker/1002,5,1
internet/47,1
irabiur/1002,5,1
itobehar/1002,5,1
izur/1002,5,1
kabar/1002,5,1
kaskar/1002,5,1
koldar/1002,5,1
kutur/1002,5,1
lander/1002,5,1
lazkar/1002,5,1
leiar/1002,5,1
loakar/1002,5,1
lurrar/1002,5,1
makur/1002,5,1
malur/1002,5,1
manukor/1002,5,1
mehar/1002,5,1
mingar/1002,5,1
mozkor/1002,5,1
mutilzahar/1002,5,1
negar/1002,5,1
oiher/1002,5,1
onar/1002,5,1
orokor/1002,5,1
partzuer/1002,5,1
piper/1002,5,1
sar/1002,5,1
sentikor/1002,5,1
sugar/1002,5,1
susper/1002,5,1
txanbihur/1002,5,1
txigor/1002,5,1
txingar/1002,5,1
uger/1002,5,1
uxter/1002,5,1
zabar/1002,5,1
zakur/1002,5,1
ziamar/1002,5,1
ziper/1002,5,1
zopizar/1002,5,1
